District of Columbia statutes.
7-1131.11

System of Mental Health Care Sub-Council.

(a)

In conformity with Mayor’s Order 99-60, effective March 16, 1999, the Director shall convene a System of Mental Health Care Sub-Council of the District’s Intragovernmental Youth Investment Collaborative, for the purpose of developing a system of care for children, youth, and their families. This Sub-Council shall continue to exist in the event that Mayor’s Order 99-60 is repealed.

(b)

The Sub-Council shall consist of the following individuals:

(1)

Director of the Child and Family Services Agency;

(2)

Director of the Department of Human Services;

(3)

Director of the Department of Health;

(4)

Administrator of the Youth Services Administration;

(5)

Administrator of the Addiction Prevention and Recovery Administration;

(6)

Administrator of the Medical Assistance Administration;

(7)

Administrator of the Mental Retardation and Developmental Disabilities Administration;

(8)

Superintendent of the District of Columbia Public Schools;

(9)

Presiding Judge of the Family Division of Superior Court of the District of Columbia;

(10)

Chair of the District of Columbia Mental Health Planning Council;

(11)

A representative of the designated state protection and advocacy agency established pursuant to the Protection and Advocacy for Mentally Ill Individuals Act of 1986, approved May 23, 1986 (100 Stat. 478; 42 U.S.C. § 10801 et seq.), and section 509 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, approved October 29, 1992 (106 Stat. 4430; 29 U.S.C. § 794e); and

(12)

At a minimum, 4 former child or youth consumers of mental health services or family members of child or youth consumers of mental health services.

Dec. 18, 2001, D.C. Law 14-56, § 111, 48 DCR 7674

For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 11 of Department of Mental Health Establishment Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-51, October 30, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 10807).

For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 11 of Department of Mental Health Establishment Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-55, May 2, 2001, 48 DCR 4390).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 11 of Department of Mental Health Establishment Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-101, July 23, 2001, 48 DCR 7123).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 111 of Mental Health Service Delivery Reform Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-144, October 23, 2001, 48 DCR 9947).